Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202545-343
Main office or branch office; move or relocate; procedure.

A licensee may move its main office or may relocate a branch office from one location to another without obtaining a new license if the licensee gives notice thereof to the director through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry at least thirty days prior to such move and pays a filing fee of one hundred fifty dollars. The director may, at the director's discretion, hold a hearing on the relocation request, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. The expense of any such hearing shall be paid by the licensee.

Laws 1965, c. 268, § 10, p. 763;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 254;

Laws 2003, LB 217, § 35;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 64.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.